Montana, session 2025, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 1, Chapter 659, Laws of 2023, is amended to read:
"Section 1. Task force on dependency and neglect court system. (1) There is a task force on
dependency and neglect court systems.
(2) The task force consists of 12 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) two three members of the house of representatives, one two of whom must be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives and one of whom must be appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives;
(b) two three members of the senate, one two of whom must be appointed by the president of the
senate and one of whom must be appointed by the minority leader of the senate;
(c) one district court judge appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court; and
(d) seven eight members appointed by the governor, none of whom may be a currently serving
legislator, including:
(i) a county attorney or their representative;
(ii) a law enforcement officer;
(iii) a representative from the governor's office a child protection specialist certified pursuant to 41-
3-127;
(iv) a tribal member with experience relating to the Indian Child Welfare Act;
(v) a member of the public having experience with the dependency and neglect court system;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 268

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 268.1
(vi) a representative of the office of state public defender; and
(vii) a representative of the department of public health and human services; and
(viii) a representative of the department of corrections.
(3) (a) Legislative members of the task force are entitled to receive compensation and expenses
as provided in 5-2-302.
(b) A nonlegislative member of the task force who is not a full-time salaried officer or employee of
the state or a political subdivision of the state is entitled to salary and expenses reimbursement for lodging,
mileage, and per diem to the same extent as a legislative member.
(c) A member of the task force who is a full-time salaried officer or employee of the state or a
political subdivision of the state is entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in 2-18-501
through 2-18-503.
(5) The task force shall select a presiding officer and a vice presiding officer by majority vote. The
presiding officer and the vice presiding officer must be legislative members.
(6) The legislative services division shall provide staff assistance to the task force. The legislative
fiscal division and the judicial branch shall provide information on request.
(7) (a) Appointments to the task force must be made by July 1, 2025.
(b) If a vacancy on the task force remains unfilled by the appropriate appointing authority for more
than 60 days, the task force may vote to appoint a member who meets the qualifications of the vacant position
until the appropriate appointing authority fills the position."

Section 2. Section 2, Chapter 659, Laws of 2023, is amended to read:
"Section 2. Task force duties. (1) The task force shall study dependency and neglect court
proceedings to determine whether a separate dependency and neglect court system or the existing court
system, with what court system enhancements, or other supports would best serve children, families, and other
participants involved in dependency and neglect court proceedings.
(2) The study must examine:
(a) a separate dependency and neglect court system, including but not limited to examining the
following:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 268

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 268.1
(i) alternative court systems that specialize in dependency and neglect cases;
(ii) structural issues related to a court specializing in dependency and neglect cases;
(iii) the manner for electing or appointing judges;
(iv) whether the dependency and neglect court system should be operated on a statewide,
regional, or local basis;
(v) changes needed to the existing court system to facilitate a separate dependency and neglect
court system;
(vi) the interaction between district courts and a separate dependency and neglect court;
(vii) funding; and
(viii) implementation of a separate dependency and neglect court; and
(b) the existing dependency and neglect court system, including but not limited to examining:
(i) changes that could be made to the current court system in place of creating a separate
dependency and neglect court system;
(a) terminology that can provide common usage in both family law and child protection cases;
(ii)(b) the strengths and weaknesses of the district courts in handling dependency and neglect cases;
(iii)(c) whether dependency and neglect specialty courts could exist on a local level;
(iv)(d) the interaction between dependency and neglect cases and family law cases;
(v)(e) whether there could be a more expanded role for family courts;
(f) issues related to incarcerated or otherwise justice-involved parents;
(vi)(g) other local court issues that affect families or dependency and neglect cases;
(vii)(h) the need for district court involvement in the addition or removal of a person's name from any
registry maintained by the department of public health and human services regarding substantiated allegations
of child abuse or neglect; and
(viii)(i) funding.
(3) The task force shall involve input from the various stakeholders involved in dependency and
neglect court proceedings and, to the extent possible, consult with outside experts about Montana's system and
systems in other states.
(4) The task force may create subcommittees. Nonlegislative members may serve on a
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 268

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 268.1
subcommittee. Unless the person is a full-time salaried officer or employee of the state or of a political
subdivision of the state, a nonlegislative member appointed to a subcommittee is entitled to salary and
expenses to the same extent as a legislative member. If the appointee is a full-time salaried officer or employee
of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, the appointee is entitled to reimbursement for travel
expenses as provided in 2-18-501 through 2-18-503.
(5) The task force may appoint working groups to study specific topics or issues as directed by the
task force. If appointed, the working group shall meet regularly and report to the task force as the task force
requires. The working group may include representatives of stakeholders that are not members of the task
force.
(6) The task force may meet no more than 12 days.
(7) All aspects of the task force, including reporting requirements, must be concluded prior to
September 15, 2024 2026. The task force shall prepare a final report of its findings, conclusions, and
recommendations and prepare draft legislation whenever appropriate. The task force shall submit the final
report to the governor, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the 69th 70th legislature."

Section 3. Section 6, Chapter 659, Laws of 2023, is amended to read:
"Section 6. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2025 2027."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective May 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 268